Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-220
Municipalities; public waters; additional powers.

All the other powers herein granted municipalities with reference to airports on land are granted to them with reference to such airports in, over and upon public waters, submerged land under public waters, and artificial or reclaimed land.

Laws 1945, c. 34, § 10(2), p. 165.